Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2405
Grants under Commission Grant Program; application; requirements.

(1) An eligible applicant may apply to the coalition for a grant under the Commission Grant Program in a manner and form prescribed by the commission for funds made available from the Commission Grant Program or the federal act. The application shall include a comprehensive juvenile services plan. Grants shall be awarded to eligible applicants at least annually within the limits of available funds until programs are available statewide.

(2) Eligible applicants may give consideration to contracting with private nonprofit agencies for the provision of programs.

Laws 1990, LB 663, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 447, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 424, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 44;

Laws 2001, LB 640, § 8.